Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1. Appointment, Qualification, Resignation, and Removal of Fiduciaries.
§ 64.2-1422.
Environmental liability of fiduciaries.

As used in this section:“Environmental law” means any federal, state, or local law, rule, regulation, or ordinance relating to protection of the environment or human health.“Fiduciary” includes guardians, committees, conservators, trustees, executors, administrators and administrators with the will annexed, curators of decedents’ wills, and attorneys-in-fact or agents acting for principals under written powers of attorney, and any combination of individuals, corporations, and other entities serving in those capacities.“Individual capacity” means the nonfiduciary capacity of any individual, corporation, or other entity serving as a fiduciary.

As to any property held in trust or in an estate, a fiduciary shall not be considered in its individual capacity to be (i) the owner or operator of that property as defined under any applicable environmental law or (ii) a party otherwise liable under any environmental law unless the fiduciary’s acts or omissions outside the scope of its fiduciary duties constitute conduct that independently would give rise to individual liability.

A fiduciary shall not be liable in its individual capacity to any beneficiary or other party for any decrease in value of assets in trust or in an estate by reason of the fiduciary’s investigation or evaluation of potential contamination of property held in the trust or estate or the fiduciary’s compliance with any environmental law, specifically including any reporting or disclosure requirement under such law.

Neither a fiduciary’s acceptance of property nor its failure to inspect property shall be deemed to create any implication as to whether or not there is or may be any liability under any environmental law with respect to such property.

Nothing in this section shall affect or modify any defense to individual liability under any environmental law available to any fiduciary under any other provision of state or federal law, including the common law.

History.

1994, c. 476, § 26-7.4; 1997, c. 801; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-1423.
Trustee not disqualified due to status as stockholder, employee, or officer of corporate noteholder; sale of property by trustee not voidable.

The fact that a trustee in a deed of trust to secure a debt due to a corporation is a stockholder, member, employee, officer, or director of, or counsel to, the corporation does not disqualify the trustee from exercising the powers conferred by the deed of trust, nor does it render voidable a sale by the trustee in the exercise of the powers conferred on him by the deed of trust so long as the trustee did not participate in the corporation’s decision as to the amount to be bid at the sale of the trust property.

In addition to the provisions of subsection A, if the lender secured by the deed of trust bids the amount secured, including interest through the date of sale and costs of foreclosure, the trustee’s participation in fixing the bid price by the lender shall not be deemed improper and the sale shall not be rendered voidable solely by reason of the trustee’s participation.

All sales made before July 1, 1990, by any trustee by virtue of a deed of trust and any deed made by the trustee in pursuance of such sales are hereby declared to be valid and effective in all respects, if otherwise valid according to laws then in force, the same as if the trustee had not been a stockholder, member, employee, officer, or director of, or counsel to, the corporation thereby secured.

History.

1920, p. 502; 1932, p. 523; Michie Code 1942, § 6304b; Code 1950, § 26-58; 1990, c. 763; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 10 Foreclosure of a Deed of Trust and a UCC Security Interest.
§ 10.2 The Mortgage Transaction, et seq. Rendleman.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 6-918 Written One-Price Bid, et seq.

§ 64.2-1424.
Resignation by fiduciary of his trust.

The circuit court in which or before the clerk of which a fiduciary qualified may allow any personal representative, guardian, conservator, or committee to resign his trust conditioned upon his accounts as the fiduciary being stated and settled in the mode prescribed by law. Such resignation shall not invalidate any act done or affect any liability incurred by him while holding such trust.

History.

Code 1919, § 5419; 1938, p. 790; Code 1950, § 26-46; 1997, c. 801; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-1425.
How securities transferred to successor.

When any securities for money loaned or invested shall be standing in the name of any fiduciary who has died or resigned or whose power has been revoked, and the fiduciary or his personal representative has not transferred the securities to his successor, the circuit court in which the fiduciary qualified, upon the petition of the successor or of any other interested person, may direct that the securities be transferred to the successor, a receiver of the court, or otherwise, and may direct that the dividends, interest, or proceeds of the securities be received or paid in such manner as the court deems proper.

History.

Code 1919, § 5432; Code 1950, § 26-56; 2012, c. 614.